data/lexd/40-verbs.lexd
LEXICON InflV_P71_pres_stem
<Prs><1Sg>:a
<Prs><2Sg>:a
<Prs><3>:a
<Prs><1Pl>:·imai
<Prs><2Pl>:·itei
<Prt><1Sg>:i
<Prt><2Sg>:i
<Prt><3>:i
<Prt><1Pl>:·imai
<Prt><2Pl>:·itei

LEXICON InflV_P71_inf_stem
<Inf>:·tun
<Opt>:·sei
<Subj><1Sg>:·lai
<Subj><2Sg>:·lai
<Subj><3>:·lai
<Subj><1Pl>:·limai
<Subj><2Pl>:·litei

LEXICON InflV_P71_imperative
<Imp><2Sg>:·ais
<Imp><2Pl>:·aiti

LEXICON InflV_P100_present
<Inf>:JSun
<Prs><1Sg>:a
<Prs><2Sg>:a
<Prs><3>:a
<Prs><1Pl>:·imai
<Prs><2Pl>:·itei

LEXICON InflV_P100_preterite
<Prt><1Sg>:a
<Prt><2Sg>:a
<Prt><3>:a
<Prt><1Pl>:·amai
<Prt><2Pl>:·atei

LEXICON InflV_P115_present
<Inf>:·twei
<Prs><1Sg>:·ma
<Prs><2Sg>:·sei
<Prs><3>:t
<Prs><1Pl>:·mai
<Prs><2Pl>:·tei

LEXICON InflV_P115_preterite
<Prt><1Sg>:·ēi
<Prt><2Sg>:·ēi
<Prt><3>:·ēi
<Prt><1Pl>:·ēimai
<Prt><2Pl>:·ēitei
